New York, session 2025-2026, A2324.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 2 391-r to read as follows: 3 § 391-r. Reusable beverage containers in sports venues. 1. For 4 purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following 5 meanings: 6 (a) "reusable beverage container" means a drinking vessel that is 7 composed primarily of aluminum or stainless steel, and is designed and 8 manufactured to be capable of multiple reuses, including a bottle or 9 cup. 10 (b) "sports venue" means a building, structure, or place in which 11 professional or collegiate sporting competitions are held. 12 2. A sports venue shall not prohibit an individual attending any 13 professional or collegiate sporting competition in such sports venue 14 from bringing a reusable beverage container into the sports venue; 15 provided, however: 16 (a) a sports venue may require that reusable beverage containers be 17 empty upon entering the sports venue; 18 (b) a sports venue may require that the reusable beverage container 19 not contain a cap; and 20 (c) a sports venue may restrict reusable beverage containers capable 21 of holding more than twenty-four fluid ounces. 22 3. Any sports venue that violates this section or any rule promulgated 23 pursuant thereto shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed five EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06229-01-5 A. 2324 2 1 hundred dollars for the first violation, and seven hundred fifty dollars 2 for any subsequent violation. 3 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 4 it shall have become a law.